afilter-lexsym.xfst
!
! Replace / delete the special symbols used in the lexicon from the analysis
! side.
!
regex  ⟪IGB⟫ -> 0
,,     ⟪c⟫ -> ç,
       ⟪p⟫ -> p,
       ⟪t⟫ -> t,
       ⟪k⟫ -> k,
       ⟪g⟫ -> g || _ \[⟪dup⟫|⟪compn⟫]
,,     ⟪c⟫ -> c,
       ⟪p⟫ -> b,
       ⟪t⟫ -> d,
       ⟪k⟫ -> ğ,
       ⟪g⟫ -> ğ || _ ⟪compn⟫
      ,,  ˈ -> 0
    ,, [⟪sBRV⟫|⟪sBUV⟫|⟪sFRV⟫|⟪sFUV⟫|⟪sUC⟫|⟪sVC⟫] -> 0
    ,, ? -> 0 || _ ⟪dup⟫
    ,, [⟪dup⟫
       |⟪del⟫
       |⟪dels⟫
       |⟪tSep⟫
       |⟪DB⟫
       |⟪prn⟫
       |⟪aorAr⟫
       |⟪causNone⟫
       |⟪causAr⟫
       |⟪causArt⟫
       |⟪causAt⟫
       |⟪causDir⟫
       |⟪causIt⟫
       |⟪causIr⟫
       |⟪rcp⟫
       |⟪rfl⟫] -> 0
    ,, ⟪dSep⟫ -> %,
! the following should also turn into analysis symbols, but not
! handled yet.
    ,, ⟪pers⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪dem⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪loc⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪refl⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪def⟫|⟪indef⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪neg⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪ques⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪onom⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪emoticon⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪unit⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪part⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪nation⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪time⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪ppadj⟫|⟪ablC⟫|⟪accC⟫|⟪datC⟫|⟪genC⟫|⟪insC⟫|⟪liC⟫|⟪nomC⟫|⟪numC⟫ -> 0
;
invert net
